apertium-pes.pes.dix
    <pardef n="برا/ی__pr">

                              <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r>ی<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r>ی<s n="pr"/></r></p><par n="S__poss"/></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ﺩرباره__pr">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

  
    
 
    <pardef n="هنوز__adv">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="هنوز__adv">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 
    
 
    <pardef n="و__cnjcoo">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 
    

    <pardef n="هر__det">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 
    <pardef n="این__det">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="دوم__det">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    

    <pardef n="یک__num">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ی"/></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ﺩﻭ__num">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="S__ی"/></e>

    </pardef>


    

    <pardef n="تاجیکستان__np">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__را"/></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="فروغ__np">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__را"/></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="الجبهة_الشعبية_لتحرير_فلسطين__np">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__را"/></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="بابک__np">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__را"/></e>

    </pardef>


    

    <pardef n="دشمن__n">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ی"/><par n="S__ه"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>‌ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__ه"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__ه"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ی"/><par n="S__ه"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="آزادی__n">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__poss"/><par n="S__ی"/><par n="S__ه"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>‌ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__ه"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="پیشوا__n">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__ه"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>‌ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="پرند/ه__n">

                              <e>       <p><l>ه</l><r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ای"/><par n="S__ه"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ه‌ها</l><r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>هها</l><r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__یی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>ه‌گان</l><r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>گان</l><r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

      
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="اجسام__n">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ی"/><par n="S__را"/></e>

    </pardef>


    

    <pardef n="بزرگ__adj">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="S__ه"/></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>‌تر</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="S__ه"/></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>‌ترین</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="S__ه"/></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>تر</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>ترین</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>تر</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>ترین</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    

    <pardef n="اوه__ij">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    
  
    <pardef n="zwnj_or_space">

                              <e>       <p><l>‌</l><r>‌</r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="space_or_zwnj">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>‌</l><r>‌</r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    
    <pardef n="P__ن">

                              <e>       <p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="P__jnjprefixes">

                              <e><par n="P__ن"/><p><l>می‌</l><r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><par n="P__ن"/><p><l>می</l><r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><par n="P__ن"/><p><l>می<b/></l><r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="P__njprefixes">

                              <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><p><l/><r/></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="P__jjprefixes">

      
		
      
                              <e r="LR"><par n="P__ن"/><p><l>ب</l><r>ب<s n="bi"/><j/></r></p></e>

      
                              <e>       <p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="P__jprefixes">

      

      
                              <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l/><r/></p></e>

			
                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="P__prefixes">

    
      
                              <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l/><r/></p></e>

                              <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l/><r/></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>


    
    <pardef n="Pjj__imp__prefixes">

      
                              <e>       <p><l>ب</l><r>ب<s n="bi"/><j/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="neg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="P__imp__prefixes">

                              <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l/><r/></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>


    

                            <e lm="ای"><i>ای</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
                            <e lm="یا"><i>یا</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
                            <e lm="ویا"><i>ویا</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
                            <e lm="لیکن"><i>لیکن</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
                            <e lm="این"><i>این</i><par n="این__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="آن"><i>آن</i><par n="این__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="شد"><i>شد</i><par n="این__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="هر"><i>هر</i><par n="هر__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="همه"><i>همه</i><par n="هر__det"/></e>
                            <e lm="برای"><i>برا</i><par n="برا/ی__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="یک"><i>یک</i><par n="یک__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="پنج"><i>پنج</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="نه"><i>نه</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="هفده"><i>هفده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="هفتاد"><i>هفتاد</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
                            <e lm="پاپوا گینه نو"><i>پاپوا<b/>گینه<b/>نو</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="فیجی"><i>فیجی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="نیجر"><i>نیجر</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="ویسكانسین"><i>ویسكانسین</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="الجبهة الشعبية لتحرير فلسطين"><i>الجبهة<b/>الشعبية<b/>لتحرير<b/>فلسطين</i><par n="الجبهة_الشعبية_لتحرير_فلسطين__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="حزب الله"><i>حزب<b/>الله</i><par n="الجبهة_الشعبية_لتحرير_فلسطين__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="المنار"><i>المنار</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="تالش"><i>تالش</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="شوروی"><i>شوروی</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="میرحسین"><i>میرحسین</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="پایتختی"><i>پایتختی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="یزدی"><i>یزدی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="مقدونی"><i>مقدونی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="جانی"><i>جانی</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="عقلانیت"><i>عقلانیت</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="وپرورش"><i>وپرورش</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="بینا"><i>بینا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="کارفرما"><i>کارفرما</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="مددجو"><i>مددجو</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="شناگر"><i>شناگر</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="لیزر"><i>لیزر</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="بازنده"><i>بازند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="حشره"><i>حشر</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="نوازنده"><i>نوازند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="امتیازاتی"><i>امتیازاتی</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="حواس"><i>حواس</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="نفوس"><i>نفوس</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="بتدریج"><i>بتدریج</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="حال"><i>حال</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="صریحاً"><i>صریحاً</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="مسلما"><i>مسلما</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
                            <e lm="جنسی"><i>جنسی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="عریان"><i>عریان</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="مستثنی"><i>مستثنی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="آه"><i>آه</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
                            <e lm="بلی"><i>بلی</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
                            <e lm="لبیک"><i>لبیک</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
